Utah statutes.
63L-6-104.   Severability clause.

If any provision of this chapter or the application of any provision to any person or circumstance is held invalid by a final decision of a court of competent jurisdiction, the remainder of this chapter shall be given effect without the invalid provision or application.  The provisions of this chapter are severable.

